nb: Harpestørrelse: Konsertflygel; Petite; Halvstor; Annet
fr: Taille de la harpe: Concert Grand; Petite; Semi-Grand; Autre
cs: Velikost harfy: Velké koncertní; Drobné; Polovelké; Jiné
en: Harp size: Concert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Other
it: Misura dell’arma: A gran coda da concerto; A codino; A coda; Altro
ko: 하프 크기: 콘서트 그랜드; 쁘띠; 세미 그랜드; 기타
ro-RO: Dimensiune harpă: Concert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Altele
pt-PT: Tamanho da harpa: Piano concert grand; Pequeno; Piano semigrande; Outro
de: Harfengröße: Konzertflügel; Zierlich; Halbgroß; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Veľkosť harfy: Koncertná sála; Malý; Stredný; Iné
th: ขนาดฮาร์ป: คอนเสิร์ตแกรนด์; เล็ก; กึ่งแกรนด์; อื่นๆ
pl: Rozmiar harfy: Koncert grand; Mały; Semi-grand; Inne
ja: ハープのサイズ: コンサートグランド; プティット; セミグランド; その他
zh-CN: 竖琴尺寸: 音乐会三角钢琴; 小; 半三角钢琴; 其他
pt-BR: Tamanho da harpa: Orquestral; Petite; Semigrande; Outro
zh-TW: 豎琴尺寸: 音樂會三角; 小型; 半三角; 其他
vi: Kích cỡ đàn hạc: Concert Grand; Petite; Semi-Grand; Khác
sv: Harpstorlek: Konsertflygel; Liten; Semi-flygel; Övrigt
es: Tamaño del arpa: Gran piano de concierto; Petite; Semigrande; Otros
ru: Размер арфы: Концертный рояль; Маленький; Полу-рояль; Другой
da: Harpestørrelse: Koncert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Andet
tr: Arp boyutu: Kuyruklu piyano; Küçük; Yarı kuyruklu; Diğer
hr-HR: Veličina harfe: Concert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Ostalo
fi: Harpun koko: Concert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Muu
sl-SI: Velikost harfe: Velika koncertna; Majhna; Polvelika; Drugo
nl: Formaat harp: Concertvleugel; Klein; Middelgroot; Andere
hu: Hárfa mérete: Nagy koncerthárfa; Kicsi; Közepes; Egyéb
bg-BG: Размер на арфата: Концертна; Малка; Полуголяма; Други
lt-LT: Arfos dydis: Didžioji koncertinė; Maža; Vidutinė; Kita
el: Μέγεθος άρπας: Concert grand; Petite; Semi-grand; Άλλο